Utah statutes.
53-16-102.   Definitions.

(1)  "Canine body armor" means a product:

(a)  sold or offered for sale as personal protective body covering; and

(b)  that is intended to protect a police service canine against gunfire, regardless of whether the product is to be worn alone or is sold as a complement to another product or garment.

(2)  "Police service canine" means a dog that:

(a)  is used by a law enforcement agency;

(b)  is specially trained or is in training for law enforcement work; and

(c)  assists a law enforcement agency in the performance of law enforcement duties.

